Texas, session 891, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 46, Penal Code, is amended by adding Section 46.055 to read as follows: Sec. 46.055.  UNLAWFUL TRANSFER OF SEMIAUTOMATIC RIFLE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly sells, rents, leases, or otherwise transfers, or offers to sell, rent, lease, or otherwise transfer a semiautomatic rifle. (b)  An offense under this section is a state jail felony. (c)  If conduct that constitutes an offense under this section also constitutes an offense under any other law, the actor may be prosecuted under this section, the other law, or both. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.